Connecticut, session 2026, SB00029.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the general statutes be amended to require that any state funds
related to the renovation of or improvements to PeoplesBank Arena, or
provided to the city of Hartford in connection with the Municipal
Accountability Review Board, be diverted to municipalities in order to
provide funding for school resource officers.